src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot !!≈ * **@CODE@** = The verb list 
sopia:sopi v1 ;
jauhaa:jauha v1 ;    !! * ...
jakaa:jaka v1 ;
trenkaa:trenka v1 ;
jatkaa:jatka v1 ;
pala:pala v1 ; !GEO?
juumaa:juuma v1 ;
nauraa:naura v1 ;
kaataa:kaata v1 ;
paahtaa:paahta v1_var ;
mahtaa:mahta v1_var ;
kaihtaa:kaihta v1 ;
johtaa:johta v1 ;
maaltaa:maalt4a v1 ;
kantaa:kanta v1 ;
juntaa:junta v1 ;
fuortaa:fuorta v1 ;
murtaa:murta v1 ;
kastaa:kasta v1 ;
maistaa:maista v1 ;
luistaa:luista v1 ;
ostaa:osta v1 ;
maustaa:mausta v1 ;
jaattaa:jaatta v1 ;
mattaa:matta v1 ;
naittaa:naitta v1 ;
lorikoittaa:lorikoitta v1 ;
voittaa:voitta v1 ;
puittaa:puitta v1 ;
ottaa:otta v1 ;
puihaottaa:puihaotta v1 ;
liikhaottaa:liikhaotta v1 ;
nuuskhaottaa:nuuskhaotta v1 ;
remhaottaa:remhaotta v1 ;
tiphaottaa:tiphaotta v1 ;
virhaottaa:virhaotta v1 ;
korhjaottaa:korhjaotta v1 ;
maalaottaa:maalaotta v1 ;
tinnaottaa:tinnaotta v1 ;
klipsaottaa:klipsaotta v1 ;
vasthaanottaa:vasthaanotta v1 ; !H5
juottaa:juotta v1 ;
vuottaa:vuotta v1 ;
auttaa:autta v1 ;
hankaluttaa:hankalutta v1 ;
luoveenuttaa:luoveenutta v1 ;
tuskainuttaa:tuskainutta v1 ;
irtainuttaa:irtainutta v1 ;
laukasuttaa:laukasutta v1 ;
ootatuttaa:ootatutta v1 ;
ilahtuttaa:ilahtutta v1 ;
potkituttaa:potkitutta v1 ;
mainotuttaa:mainotutta v1 ;
kiilastuttaa:kiilastutta v1 ;
koirastuttaa:koirastutta v1 ;
huolestuttaa:huolestutta v1 ;
lannistuttaa:lannistutta v1 ;
kutistuttaa:kutistutta v1 ;
innostuttaa:innostutta v1 ;
tutustuttaa:tutustutta v1 ;
puuttaa:puutta v1 ;
noutaa:nouta v1 ;
nuutaa:nuuta v1 ;
kuivaa:kuiva v1 ;
hakea:hake v1 ;
hokea:hoke v1 ;
koskea:koske v1 ;
tukea:tuke v1 ;
vahtea:vahte v1_var ;
lauhtea:lauhte v1_var ;
totea+Err/Orth:tote v1 ; !EK!
kielakoittea:kielakoitte v1 ;
kirakoittea:kirakoitte v1 ;
talikoittea:talikoitte v1 ;
rahnikoittea:rahnikoitte v1 ;
veitikoittea:veitikoitte v1 ;
haarukoittea:haarukoitte v1 ;
jumaloittea:jumaloitte v1 ;
kaaveloittea:kaaveloitte v1 ;
hutiloittea:hutiloitte v1 ;
toljanoittea:toljanoitte v1 ;
liekaroittea:liekaroitte v1 ;
klekkaroittea:klekkaroitte v1 ;
koparoittea:koparoitte v1 ;
pisaroittea:pisaroitte v1 ;
veivaroittea:veivaroitte v1 ;
koperoittea:koperoitte v1 ;
laiskuroittea:laiskuroitte v1 ;
kippuroittea:kippuroitte v1 ;
tentturoittea:tentturoitte v1 ;
haravoittea:haravoitte v1 ;
kutea:kute v1 ;
nuuhia:nuuhi v1 ;
naakia:naaki v1 ;
naakkia:naakki v1 ;
muikkia:muikki v1 ;
vuolkkia:vuolkki v1 ;
trookkia:trookki v1 ;
narkkia:narkki v1 ;
toukkia:toukki v1 ;
mankia:manki v1 ;
vonkia:vonki v1 ;
maiskia:maiski v1 ;
tuiskia:tuiski v1 ;
moskia:moski v1 ;
nuuskia:nuuski v1 ;
potkia:potki v1 ;
lukia:luki v1 ;
halia:hali v1 ;
kohmia:kohmi v1 ;
mammia:mammi v1 ;
kohnia:kohni v1 ;
painia:paini v1 ;
munia:muni v1 ;
kuopia:kuopi v1 ;
kraappia:kraappi v1 ;
krooppia:krooppi v1 ;
jupia:jupi v1 ;
mairia:mairi v1 ;
suoria:suori v1 ;
kouria:kouri v1 ;
kulsia:kulsi v1 ;
klumpsia:klumpsi v1 ;
klopsia:klopsi v1 ;
karsia:karsi v1 ;
tassia:tassi v1 ;
uusia:uusi v1 ;
kahtia:kahti v1 ;
tohtia:tohti v1 ;
sotia:soti v1 ;
nauttia:nautti v1 ;
tuutia:tuuti v1 ;
juovia:juovi v1 ;
kahoa:kaho v1 ;
inhoa:inho v1 ;
nioa:nio v1 ;
kurjoa:kurjo v1 ;
vakoa:vako v1 ;
aikoa:aiko v1 ;
vikoa:viko v1 ;
pelkkoa:pelkko v1 ;
penkoa:penko v1 ;
kiskoa:kisko v1 ;
liuskoa:liusko v1 ;
ratkoa:ratko v1 ;
laukoa:lauko v1 ;
keloa:kelo v1 ;
niloa:nilo v1 ;
neuloa:neulo v1 ;
tihmoa:tihmo v1 ;
kammoa:kammo v1 ;
juumoa:juumo v1 ;
vihnoa:vihno v1 ;
vannoa:vanno v1 ;
napoa:napo v1 ;
nopoa:nopo v1 ;
teippoa:teippo v1 ;
solmia:solmia v1 ;
nupoa:nupo v1 ;
vieroa:viero v1 ;
tauroa:tauro v1 ;
vesoa:veso v1 ;
vaaksoa:vaakso v1 ;
varsoa:varso v1 ;
patoa:pato v1 ;
liehtoa:liehto v1 ;
fleuhtoa:fleuhto v1 ;
sitoa:sito v1 ;
lastoa:lasto v1 ;
pirstoa:pirsto v1 ;
plittoa:plitto v1 ;
teutoa:teuto v1 ;
tihvoa:tihvo v1 ;
valvoa:valvo v1 ;
harvoa:harvo v1 ;
halvata+Err/Orth:halva v1 ;
kehua:kehu v1 ;
keijua:keiju v1 ;
nuljua:nulju v1 ;
torjua:torju v1 ;
uihkua:uihku v1 ;
liekkua:liekku v1 ;
liikkua:liikku v1 ;
vankkua:vankku v1 ;
klonkkua:klonkku v1 ;
kuorkkua:kuorkku v1 ;
maukkua:maukku v1 ;
kukkua:kukku v1 ;
mankua:manku v1 ;
vonkua:vonku v1 ;
naskua:nasku v1 ;
loiskua:loisku v1 ;
kerskua:kersku v1 ;
louskua:lousku v1 ;
kitkua:kitku v1 ;
rotkua:rotku v1 ;
naukua:nauku v1 ;
talua:talu v1 ;
kiilua:kiilu v1 ;
imua:imu v1 ;
inua:inu v1 ;
toipua:toipu v1 ;
tippua:tippu v1 ;
virua:viru v1 ;
paisua:paisu v1 ;
klitsua:klitsu v1 ;
patua:patu v1 ;
mahtua:mahtu v1_var ;
reitua:reitu v1 ;
kaltua:kaltu v1 ;
intreseeraintua:intreseeraintu v1 ;
tuntua:tuntu v1 ;
istua:istu v1 ;
suosia:suosi v1 ;
palttua:palttu v1 ;
varttua:varttu v1 ;
teutua:teutu v1 ;
nylkeä:nylke v1 ;
imeä:ime v1 ;
vättylöitteä:vättylöitte v1 ;
höperöitteä:höperöitte v1 ;
köhiä:köhi v1 ;
öhkiä:öhki v1 ;
köykkiä:köykki v1 ;
pläiskiä:pläiski v1 ;
vötkiä:vötki v1 ;
kyyliä:kyyli v1 ;
kähniä:kähni v1 ;
kömpiä:kömpi v1 ;
kärpiä:kärpi v1 ;
nyyriä:nyyri v1 ;
keksiä:keksi v1 ;
vetelehtiä:vetelehti v1 ;
läättiä:läätti v1 ;
hyljyä:hyljy v1 ;
välkkyä:välkky v1 ;
näkyä:näky v1 ;
häipyä:häipy v1 ;
veelsyä:veelsy v1 ;
ehtyä:ehty v1 ;
ystävöityä:ystävöity v1 ;
vääntyä:väänt4y v1 ;
äärtyä:äärt4y v1 ;
tystyä:tysty v1 ;
ystävöittyä:ystävöitty v1 ;
hyytyä:hyyty v1 ;
päätyä:pääty v1 ;
jietää:jietä v1 ;
tietää:ti v1_tietaa ;
meänkielentää:meänkielentä v1 ;
vääntää:väänt4ä v1 ;
pyörtää:pyörtä v1 ;
niistää:niistä v1 ;
ryöstää:ryöstä v1 ;
ittää:ittä v1 ;
piittää:piittä v1 ;
kinneröittää:kinneröittä v1 ;
kärttää:kärttä v1 ;
nyttää:nyttä v1 ;
mätänyttää:mätänyttä v1 ;
tyrmistyttää:tyrmistyttä v1 ;
pestätyttää:pestätyttä v1 ;
jättää:jättä v1 ;
ryytää:ryytä v1 ;
kylpöä:kylpö v1 ;
tiettyä:tietty v1 ; 
